Hawaii statutes.
[§89E-7] Reporting requirements; reduction
in personnel counts. The head of the agency that provided benefits under
this chapter shall:

(1) Transmit a report of every position identified
for abolishment and vacated under this chapter to the directors of finance and
human resources development, who shall abolish these positions from the
appropriate budget and personnel files. The governor shall report this
information to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening
of each regular session beginning with the regular session of 2017;

(2) Reduce its personnel count by every position
identified for abolishment and vacated under this chapter, whether the former
incumbent vacated the position as a result of accepting a severance benefit or
special retirement benefit authorized under this chapter or of exercising
reduction-in-force rights; and

(3) Transmit a list that includes each employee who
received benefits under this chapter and the benefit received by the employee
to the directors of finance and human resources development. [L Sp 2016 2d, c 1,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next